Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The delegation of authority related to California motor vehicle emissions standards has caused unintended consequences. Individuals have not been able to register vehicles that meet federal manufacturing standards that they own. From September 2023 to September 2024, the department of licensing had to grant 407,541 exemptions to the policy so that vehicles could be registered, at additional time and resources for the people, vehicle subagents, and the governmental organizations that administer vehicle registrations. The state benefits when every vehicle that operates on the public roads is legally registered and when government operates in an efficient manner. The legislature intends to improve the lives of all of the people who had to seek an exemption and all of the workers who do not want to tell people they cannot register their vehicles because of California motor vehicle emissions standards.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 70A.30.010 (Department of ecology to adopt rules to implement California motor vehicle emission standards) and 2020 c 143 s 1, 2020 c 20 s 1366, 2010 c 76 s 1, & 2005 c 295 s 2; and(2) RCW 70A.30.030 (New vehicle greenhouse gas emissions disclosureâRule-making authority) and 2020 c 143 s 2, 2014 c 76 s 8, & 2008 c 32 s 2.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 70A.15 RCW to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to provide authority to the department to adopt any motor vehicle emissions standard of the state of California.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The department of licensing is directed to start licensing vehicles that were prohibited due to California motor vehicle emissions standards if they otherwise meet state requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The department of ecology is directed to repeal any rules that implement the California motor vehicle emissions standards or were based on the statutory authority repealed in this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---